Utah statutes.
78B-1-117.   Jurors and witnesses -- State payment for jurors and subpoenaed persons -- Appropriations and costs -- Expenses in justice court.

(1)  The state is responsible for payment of all fees and expenses authorized by law for prosecution witnesses, witnesses subpoenaed by indigent defendants, and interpreter costs in criminal actions in the courts of record and actions in the juvenile court. The state is responsible for payment of all fees and expenses authorized by law for jurors in the courts of record.  For these payments, the Judicial Council shall receive an annual appropriation contained in a separate line item appropriation.

(2)  If expenses exceed the line item appropriation, the administrator of the courts shall submit a claim against the state to the Board of Examiners and request the board to recommend and submit a supplemental appropriation request to the Legislature for the deficit incurred.

(3)  In the justice courts, the fees, mileage, and other expenses authorized by law for jurors, prosecution witnesses, witnesses subpoenaed by indigent defendants, and interpreter costs shall be paid by the municipality if the action is prosecuted by the city attorney, and by the county if the action is prosecuted by the county attorney or district attorney.

